Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1603
Department, defined.

For purposes of the Homeless Shelter Assistance Trust Fund Act, department shall mean the Department of Health and Human Services.

Laws 1992, LB 1192, § 3;

Laws 2001, LB 516, § 1.